espanol_sustantivo.lexc
!!!espanol_sustantivo.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +MASC +FEM +SG +PLR

LEXICON Root

Sust;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+MASC+SG:0   #;
+N+MASC+PL:^s  #;
+N+FEM+SG:*    #;
+N+FEM+PL:*^s  #;

LEXICON Sust
irritante Ninf;
afgano Ninf;
roa Ninf;
despido Ninf;
aglutinante Ninf;
hacedor Ninf;
desembarque Ninf;
polifásico Ninf;
perforador Ninf;
ver Ninf;
welter Ninf;
igual Ninf;
gacho Ninf;
adiestrador Ninf;
loísta Ninf;
reconstituyente Ninf;
saudí Ninf;
renano Ninf;
vasoconstrictor Ninf;
truhán Ninf;
doméstico Ninf;
extractador Ninf;
variable Ninf;
orza Ninf;
larga Ninf;
adicionador Ninf;
acero Ninf;
baleo Ninf;
manifiesto Ninf;
sustantivo Ninf;
balneario Ninf;
enrasado Ninf;
rebaño Ninf;
marinada Ninf;
trímero Ninf;
tirita Ninf;
vecero Ninf;
enano Ninf;
amago Ninf;
romancista Ninf;
barbipungente Ninf;
marrano Ninf;
valido Ninf;
arriada Ninf;
activo Ninf;
almenara Ninf;
chino Ninf;
público Ninf;
hembra Ninf;
huelveño Ninf;
británico Ninf;
trasladador Ninf;
gallofo Ninf;
epirota Ninf;
sardicense Ninf;
preservativo Ninf;
ahorro Ninf;
vil Ninf;
sofoco Ninf;
substitutivo Ninf;
corte Ninf;
gofrado Ninf;
indiscreto Ninf;
curioso Ninf;
conquistador Ninf;
humanista Ninf;
dentudo Ninf;
tributario Ninf;
sustituto Ninf;
legislador Ninf;
desuello Ninf;
senario Ninf;
ojibwa Ninf;
espera Ninf;
portacohetes Ninf;
manchú Ninf;
practicante Ninf;
orilla Ninf;
electrodinámica Ninf;
cordubense Ninf;
aserrador Ninf;
recortable Ninf;
decasílabo Ninf;
espinosista Ninf;
limosnero Ninf;
barbero Ninf;
aplicador Ninf;
ballenera Ninf;
ajedrezado Ninf;
escofina Ninf;
carca Ninf;
tarado Ninf;
rubia Ninf;
asentada Ninf;
cominero Ninf;
cocedero Ninf;
abuso Ninf;
maxilar Ninf;
célibe Ninf;
sentir Ninf;
bocha Ninf;
parafraseador Ninf;
bina Ninf;
plano Ninf;
culpado Ninf;
borde Ninf;
suevo Ninf;
clasificador Ninf;
maquillador Ninf;
estera Ninf;
sulfuro Ninf;
trímetro Ninf;
ondeado Ninf;
germinador Ninf;
personal Ninf;
maleador Ninf;
estudiante Ninf;
criminal Ninf;
hispanohablante Ninf;
desacierto Ninf;
sofrenada Ninf;
arremango Ninf;
triploide Ninf;
relleno Ninf;
contencioso Ninf;
renqueo Ninf;
discutidor Ninf;
chimbo Ninf;
entendido Ninf;
alícuota Ninf;
aspaviento Ninf;
congelador Ninf;
plegador Ninf;
meta Ninf;
maniqueo Ninf;
quiebro Ninf;
tenida Ninf;
telemecánica Ninf;
tranviario Ninf;
cavador Ninf;
catarroso Ninf;
asedio Ninf;
barcelonista Ninf;
carboneo Ninf;
base Ninf;
abate Ninf;
obra Ninf;
productor Ninf;
papeleo Ninf;
espinoso Ninf;
ocupante Ninf;
disfrute Ninf;
secante Ninf;
tortero Ninf;
peloponesiaco Ninf;
desvergüenza Ninf;
tolteca Ninf;
manteador Ninf;
apodo Ninf;
mojo Ninf;
avalúo Ninf;
cuatrimotor Ninf;
impago Ninf;
acuífero Ninf;
barbote Ninf;
hepática Ninf;
cientificista Ninf;
hambriento Ninf;
socarra Ninf;
pespunte Ninf;
ibérico Ninf;
deshecho Ninf;
avasallador Ninf;
cacereño Ninf;
cirílico Ninf;
crónica Ninf;
desbarbadora Ninf;
patrullera Ninf;
diario Ninf;
afrancesado Ninf;
electromecánica Ninf;
intercesor Ninf;
flete Ninf;
finolis Ninf;
climatizador Ninf;
subsidiaria Ninf;
recogedor Ninf;
vapuleador Ninf;
eutiquiano Ninf;
plantadora Ninf;
rizófago Ninf;
trance Ninf;
caducifolio Ninf;
sureño Ninf;
desprestigio Ninf;
licencia Ninf;
tuna Ninf;
celtibero Ninf;
revenido Ninf;
meada Ninf;
abortista Ninf;
fallo Ninf;
botarate Ninf;
viso Ninf;
desdoro Ninf;
regulativo Ninf;
desesperanza Ninf;
brea Ninf;
andariego Ninf;
náguatle Ninf;
hotelero Ninf;
refrito Ninf;
mancarrón Ninf;
antropoideo Ninf;
zampeado Ninf;
filatero Ninf;
mirobrigense Ninf;
compadreo Ninf;
puntillado Ninf;
desmoche Ninf;
chiquito Ninf;
combinado Ninf;
blinda Ninf;
sucesor Ninf;
internacional Ninf;
magdaleniense Ninf;
alelo Ninf;
gaélico Ninf;
alcorza Ninf;
incomodador Ninf;
gobernador Ninf;
virada Ninf;
simpaticolítico Ninf;
sarmático Ninf;
prisciliano Ninf;
h Ninf;
contrachapado Ninf;
profesional Ninf;
dístico Ninf;
multiplex Ninf;
fisión Ninf;
canino Ninf;
redero Ninf;
parlón Ninf;
anotador Ninf;
químico Ninf;
sudanés Ninf;
resaca Ninf;
soldador Ninf;
paseo Ninf;
llorón Ninf;
atropellador Ninf;
creador Ninf;
santanderino Ninf;
ocular Ninf;
diestra Ninf;
peruano Ninf;
sedante Ninf;
avispa Ninf;
petrarquista Ninf;
balística Ninf;
excavadora Ninf;
armenio Ninf;
mordedor Ninf;
mixturero Ninf;
cinta Ninf;
naviero Ninf;
pensionado Ninf;
retrorreflector Ninf;
tapuya Ninf;
pronto Ninf;
bisojo Ninf;
irresponsable Ninf;
reformatorio Ninf;
apuesta Ninf;
andas Ninf;
ceñidor Ninf;
encerado Ninf;
paredaña Ninf;
monocable Ninf;
demandante Ninf;
obsequiador Ninf;
incestuoso Ninf;
cornúpeta Ninf;
destructor Ninf;
toxicómano Ninf;
malmaridada Ninf;
militar Ninf;
barro Ninf;
pasadero Ninf;
norteamericano Ninf;
individualista Ninf;
noventón Ninf;
encandilador Ninf;
parrafeo Ninf;
oxidante Ninf;
perezoso Ninf;
prematuro Ninf;
convencional Ninf;
zanguango Ninf;
ciego Ninf;
toqueteo Ninf;
mora Ninf;
atrabiliario Ninf;
modificador Ninf;
grandullón Ninf;
esperanza Ninf;
gringo Ninf;
mariscada Ninf;
recobro Ninf;
bebestible Ninf;
bastarda Ninf;
referente Ninf;
economizador Ninf;
abridero Ninf;
destructorio Ninf;
retracto Ninf;
frotador Ninf;
yeguato Ninf;
volantín Ninf;
excavador Ninf;
cloqueo Ninf;
marrón Ninf;
criticador Ninf;
endoso Ninf;
dobladillo Ninf;
respingo Ninf;
desfasador Ninf;
izquierda Ninf;
psicotécnico Ninf;
timonero Ninf;
complejo Ninf;
bautista Ninf;
asiático Ninf;
carilla Ninf;
atenuador Ninf;
jara Ninf;
aborto Ninf;
pasivo Ninf;
deshidratador Ninf;
totonaco Ninf;
salario Ninf;
adjetivo Ninf;
archivador Ninf;
peludo Ninf;
faroleo Ninf;
kilométrico Ninf;
curtido Ninf;
pilote Ninf;
castaña Ninf;
emponzoñador Ninf;
realengo Ninf;
lugareño Ninf;
nodriza Ninf;
farfullador Ninf;
gestante Ninf;
contienda Ninf;
reivindicatoria Ninf;
vergonzoso Ninf;
solitario Ninf;
parado Ninf;
privilegiado Ninf;
perforadora Ninf;
motivo Ninf;
anunciador Ninf;
canadiense Ninf;
reformador Ninf;
abridor Ninf;
compactado Ninf;
melanoderma Ninf;
arrebol Ninf;
rútilo Ninf;
recocho Ninf;
villano Ninf;
rota Ninf;
polaco Ninf;
lidia Ninf;
nueva Ninf;
esclavo Ninf;
oreo Ninf;
lindero Ninf;
garante Ninf;
cavernario Ninf;
uncial Ninf;
utilitarista Ninf;
romanista Ninf;
desmayo Ninf;
jabato Ninf;
quichua Ninf;
remanente Ninf;
tejar Ninf;
estaquilla Ninf;
chiste Ninf;
biónica Ninf;
loa Ninf;
rascador Ninf;
preparatorio Ninf;
atado Ninf;
pisto Ninf;
catiro Ninf;
trompeteo Ninf;
bonachón Ninf;
frecuentativo Ninf;
prelitoral Ninf;
trufa Ninf;
cuboides Ninf;
grata Ninf;
embargo Ninf;
débil Ninf;
patinador Ninf;
antiabolicionista Ninf;
capción Ninf;
vesicante Ninf;
fosfatado Ninf;
gorrista Ninf;
verdeo Ninf;
hinchada Ninf;
adulto Ninf;
perulero Ninf;
suavizador Ninf;
eosinófilo Ninf;
promovedor Ninf;
chasca Ninf;
empollón Ninf;
cimarrón Ninf;
geofísica Ninf;
beliceño Ninf;
sacudidor Ninf;
esposas Ninf;
eliminatoria Ninf;
cáfrido Ninf;
eslavo Ninf;
etmoides Ninf;
retruco Ninf;
